Colorado statutes. TITLE 19 Children's Code
PART 12
JUVENILE PAROLE

19-2.5-1201. Juvenile parole board - creation - membership - authority - rules.

There is created a juvenile parole board, referred to in this part 12 as the "board". The board consists of nine members appointed by the governor and confirmed by the senate. Members are appointed for terms of three years; except that the terms shall
be staggered so that one-third of the membership of the board becomes vacant each year. There are no term limits for the members of the board. Any vacancy that occurs when the general assembly is not in session may be filled by
the governor, and such member serves temporarily until confirmed at the next regular session of the general assembly. The board is a type 1 entity, as defined in section 24-1-105.

All nine members are voting members. All members must be residents of the state of Colorado. Of the nine members:

One member is from the department of human services;

One member is from the department of education;

One member is from the department of public safety;

One member is from the department of labor and employment; and

Five members are from the public at large and must not be employees of the state government. At least one of the members from the public at large must be a resident of the area west of the continental divide.

All members serve at the pleasure of the governor, and the governor shall designate one member of the board to act as chairperson.

The full board meets not less than once a month, and the presence of five members, at least two of whom are members described in subsection (2)(e) of this section, constitutes a quorum to transact official business of the full board.

All members of the board are reimbursed for expenses necessarily incurred in the performance of their duties. In addition to the reimbursement of expenses, the five at-large board members shall receive a per diem of one hundred fifty dollars per full
day and seventy-five dollars per half day spent transacting official business of the board.

The department of human services shall furnish clerical and other assistance for the board. A juvenile parole board administrator appointed by the executive director of the department of human services shall supervise such clerical and other assistance
provided pursuant to this subsection (6).

The board may grant, deny, defer, suspend, revoke, or specify or modify the conditions of any parole for any juvenile committed to the department of human services pursuant to section 19-2.5-1103 or 19-2.5-1127 in a manner that is in the best interests
of the juvenile and the public. In addition to any other conditions, the board may require, as a condition of parole, any adjudicated juvenile to attend school or an educational program or to work toward the attainment of a high
school diploma or the successful completion of a high school equivalency examination, as that term is defined in section 22-33-102 (8.5); except that the board shall not require any such juvenile to attend a school from which the
juvenile has been expelled without the prior approval of that school's local board of education. The board shall promulgate rules that establish criteria under which its parole decisions are made. The board has the duties and responsibilities
specified in this part 12.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 664, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2022:
(1), IP(2), and (5) amended, (SB 22-013), ch. 2, p. 26, § 31, effective February 25; (1) amended, (SB 22-162), ch. 469, p. 3375, § 64, effective August 10.

19-2.5-1202. Juvenile parole - organization.

Juvenile parole services are administered by the division of youth services in the department of human services, under the direction of the director of the division of youth services, appointed pursuant to section 19-2.5-1501.

The director of the division shall appoint juvenile parole officers and other personnel of the division of youth services pursuant to section 13 of article XII of the state constitution and with the consent of the department of human services. Juvenile
parole officers have the powers and duties specified in section 19-2.5-1204 and the powers of peace officers, as described in sections 16-2.5-101 and 16-2.5-138.

The division of youth services may divide juvenile parole supervision into regions throughout the state. Within each region there may be more than one office location for parole officers.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 665, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-209 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-1203. Juvenile parole - hearing panels - definition.

Juvenile parole board - hearing panels authority. The juvenile parole board, established pursuant to section 19-2.5-1201, may grant, deny, defer, suspend, revoke, or specify or modify the conditions of any parole for any juvenile committed to the department
of human services pursuant to sections 19-2.5-1103 and 19-2.5-1127. In addition to any other conditions, the board may require, as a condition of parole, any adjudicated juvenile to attend school or an educational program or to
work toward the attainment of a high school diploma or the successful completion of a high school equivalency examination, as that term is defined in section 22-33-102 (8.5); except that the board shall not require any juvenile
to attend a school from which the juvenile has been expelled without the prior approval of that school's local board of education. The board may modify any of its decisions, or those of the hearing panel, except an order of discharge.

The board or a hearing panel has subpoena power and the power to administer oaths to secure attendance and testimony at hearings before the board. All relevant records pertaining to the juvenile must be made available to the board.

The board or hearing panel shall take into consideration the results of the validated risk and needs assessment administered by the department of human services.

In making release and discharge decisions, the board or hearing panel shall use the length of stay matrix and release criteria developed pursuant to section 19-2.5-1117 (7).

If a written request is made by the juvenile, the juvenile's parents or guardian, or the executive director of the department of human services or the executive director's designee, the board may review the case of any juvenile who has been interviewed
by a hearing panel. If such a review is made, the board has the authority to affirm or reverse the decision of the hearing panel or to impose such additional conditions for parole as the board deems appropriate.

Hearing panels consisting of two members of the board shall interview and review the record of each juvenile who comes before the board for the granting of parole. Whenever possible, one of the hearing panel members must be a representative of an executive
department, and the other must be a member from the public at large. A hearing panel may grant, deny, defer, suspend, revoke, or specify or modify the conditions of any parole of a juvenile that are in the best interests
of the juvenile and the public; except that:

(I) If the members of a hearing panel disagree, a review of that case must be referred to the board for review and a decision made by a majority vote of the board members present. At least a quorum of the board, as defined in section 19-2.5-1201 (4),
must be present to make a decision pursuant to this subsection (3)(a)(I).

(II) The hearing panel does not have authority to grant parole to juveniles committed as violent juvenile offenders as described in section 19-2.5-1125 (3) or aggravated juvenile offenders as described in section 19-2.5-1125 (4). In such cases, the board
shall conduct a hearing and make a decision by a majority vote of the board members present at the hearing. However, if expiration of the juvenile's commitment is imminent, as defined by the board, the hearing panel
shall hold a hearing and make a recommendation to the board. The board shall review the case and make a decision by a majority vote of the board members present.

If a juvenile, while under a juvenile commitment, is in jail pending adult charges, the board may conduct a parole hearing without the juvenile's presence.

When the board conducts a hearing pursuant to subsection (3)(a) or (3)(b) of this section, a quorum, as defined in section 19-2.5-1201 (4), must be present.

In addition to any other conditions, the hearing panel may require, as a condition of parole, any adjudicated juvenile to attend school or an educational program or to work toward the attainment of a high school diploma or the successful completion of
a high school equivalency examination, as that term is defined in section 22-33-102 (8.5); except that the hearing panel shall not require any such juvenile to attend a school from which the juvenile has been expelled without
the prior approval of that school's local board of education.

The juvenile parole board administrator appointed pursuant to section 19-2.5-1201 (6) shall assist the hearing panel in its duties. The administrator shall also arrange training for the members of the board in all aspects of the juvenile justice system.
It is mandatory for members of the board to attend such training.

If the hearing panel or the board determines that parole should be granted, the hearing panel shall establish six months as the length of the parole supervision. However, for a juvenile committed to the department of human services due to an adjudication
for an offense specified in subsection (5)(b) of this section, the hearing panel may extend the period of parole supervision up to an additional fifteen months if the hearing panel makes findings of special circumstances
that warrant an extended period of parole services for the juvenile.

Subsection (5)(a) of this section allowing for extension of the period of parole applies to juveniles committed to the department of human services due to an adjudication for one or more of the following offenses:

Any offense specified in article 3 of title 18 or in part 3 of article 4 of title 18 that would constitute a felony if committed by an adult;

Incest, as described in section 18-6-301;

Aggravated incest, as described in section 18-6-302;

Child abuse, as described in section 18-6-401, that would constitute a felony if committed by an adult;

Fourth degree arson, as described in section 18-4-105, that would constitute a felony if committed by an adult;

Assault during escape, as described in section 18-8-206, that would constitute a felony if committed by an adult;

Felony illegal possession of a handgun by a juvenile, as described in section 18-12-108.5, that would constitute a felony if committed by an adult;

Misdemeanor illegal possession of a handgun by a juvenile, as described in section 18-12-108.5, that would constitute a misdemeanor if committed by an adult, if the juvenile is contemporaneously committed to the department of human services for an offense
that would constitute a felony if committed by an adult; or

Attempt, conspiracy, or solicitation to commit any of the offenses specified in this subsection (5)(b), which attempt, conspiracy, or solicitation would constitute a felony if committed by an adult.

Upon completion of the period of parole supervision as established by the board, the juvenile is deemed to have discharged the juvenile's sentence to commitment in the same manner as if the sentence were discharged pursuant to law.

If the juvenile court commits a juvenile to the department of human services for concurrent sentences based on the commission of two or more offenses or consecutive sentences based on commission of two or more offenses, the juvenile is subject to one
six-month mandatory period of parole, unless the period of parole is extended pursuant to subsection (5)(a) of this section.

As used in this subsection (5)(d), "concurrent sentence" means sentences identified by the court as concurrent and any sentences, or portions thereof, that are served simultaneously and that are the basis of the juvenile's treatment services during the
juvenile's commitment.

If a juvenile's parole is revoked pursuant to section 19-2.5-1206, the juvenile shall serve all or a portion of the remainder of the sentence to commitment, and the period of reparole or extended period of reparole imposed pursuant to subsection (5)(a)
of this section must be reduced by any time served on parole prior to the revocation. This subsection (5)(e) does not limit the board's authority to grant, deny, defer, suspend, revoke, or modify a juvenile's parole
within the period of parole.

If a juvenile's parole is revoked or modified pursuant to section 19-2.5-1206, and the juvenile has completed the period of commitment imposed by the court, the period of parole, or extended period of parole imposed pursuant to subsection (5)(a) of this
section must continue pursuant to section 19-2.5-1117 (1)(c)(II). The period of parole continues regardless of whether the revocation or modification authorizes the department of human services to place the juvenile
in a residential placement while on parole status. This does not limit the board's authority to grant, deny, defer, suspend, revoke, or modify a juvenile's parole within the period of parole.

If the hearing panel or the board determines that parole should be granted, the hearing panel or board shall order the parolee to pay any unpaid restitution that has previously been ordered as a condition of parole.

Notice.

The board, prior to consideration of the case of a juvenile for parole, shall notify the committing court, any affected juvenile community review board, the prosecuting attorney, and any victims of the juvenile's actions whose names and addresses have
been provided by the district attorney of the time and place of the juvenile's hearing before the board or a hearing panel of the board. The notice must be given in order that the persons notified have an opportunity to
present written testimony to the hearing panel or the board. The board, in its sole discretion, may allow oral testimony at any hearing and has sole discretion regarding who may attend a juvenile parole hearing.

Prior to consideration of the case of a juvenile for parole, the board shall provide notice of the time and place of the juvenile's hearing before the board or a hearing panel of the board to a victim who has provided to the division of youth services
or the board a written statement pursuant to sections 24-4.1-302.5 and 24-4.1-303. The notice and subsequent interactions with the victim must be consistent with article 4.1 of title 24. (b) (I) (A) Prior
to consideration of the case of a juvenile for parole, the board shall provide notice of the time and place of the juvenile's hearing before the board or a hearing panel of the board to a victim who has
provided to the division of youth services or the board a written statement pursuant to sections 24-4.1-302.5 and 24-4.1-303. The notice and subsequent interactions with the victim must be consistent with
article 4.1 of title 24.

The board shall notify the victim of changes in the juvenile's parole pursuant to section 24-4.1-303 (14.3).

For a juvenile who is currently serving parole that implicates article 4.1 of title 24, the division of youth services shall notify the board of any discharge as a matter of law and any placement change that may impact public safety or victim safety as
determined by the division of youth services, including any escape or recapture.

Representation of juvenile - parent. The juvenile and the juvenile's parents or guardian must be informed that they may be represented by counsel in any hearing before the board or a hearing panel to grant, modify, or revoke parole.

Parole discharge.

The board may discharge a juvenile from parole after the juvenile has served the mandatory parole period of six months but prior to the expiration of the period of parole supervision when it appears to the board that there is a reasonable probability
that the juvenile will remain at liberty without violating the law.

Based upon a request and recommendation by the division of youth services, the board may discharge all or a portion of a juvenile's period of parole, as defined in section 19-2.5-1117 (1)(b), without holding a hearing before the board or a hearing panel
of the board, if the board finds that:

The juvenile is unavailable to complete the period of parole or the extended period of parole and the juvenile is not likely to become available in a time or manner in which the juvenile will benefit from parole services and neither community safety nor
restorative justice interests will be served through the imposition or continuation of the juvenile's parole; or

The community interest in safety or restorative justice will not be served through the imposition or continuation of juvenile parole because the juvenile is under the adult probation supervision of the district court.

As used in this subsection (9), a juvenile is unavailable to complete the period of parole if:

The juvenile, pursuant to an adult sentence, has been placed in a department of corrections facility, adult community corrections, the youthful offender system, or a local jail, as defined in section 17-1-102; or

The juvenile has been or will be transferred out of the state of Colorado and the division of youth services determines that the discharge is not in conflict with the interstate compact on juveniles, part 7 of article 60 of title 24; or

The juvenile is in a medical, mental health, treatment facility, or similar institution; or

The board finds any other circumstance that constitutes unavailability as established in rule.

The board may discharge a juvenile from parole before completion of the mandatory six-month parole period when the board finds that the juvenile meets, at a minimum, all of the following conditions of special achievement:

Graduation from a high school or successful completion of a high school equivalency examination, as that term is defined in section 22-33-102 (8.5);

Payment of one hundred percent of any restitution the juvenile has been ordered to pay;

Certification by the juvenile's parole officer that the juvenile is ready for discharge from parole, that takes into consideration the results of an objective risk assessment conducted by the department of human services and is based upon researched factors
that have been demonstrated to be correlative to risk to the community; and

Presentation to the board of a plan of action prepared by the juvenile that includes the steps the juvenile will accomplish to ensure a transition to law-abiding citizenship. If the juvenile's plan of action includes an intent to enlist in military service,
the plan must specify the interim steps that the juvenile will take prior to entering military service.

A discharge from parole pursuant to this subsection (9) has the same legal effect as if parole had been discharged upon completion of juvenile parole or when the sentence to commitment was discharged as a matter of law.

Notwithstanding any provisions of law to the contrary, the department of human services shall not retain custody of or jurisdiction over an individual who reaches twenty-one years of age. The sentence to commitment and the period of parole are discharged
as a matter of law when a juvenile reaches twenty-one years of age.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 665, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-1002 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-1204. Parole officers - powers - duties.

Under the direction of the director of the division of youth services, the juvenile parole officer or officers in each region established in section 19-2.5-1202 (3) shall supervise all juveniles living in the region who, having been committed to the department
of human services, are on parole from one of its facilities.

The juvenile parole officer shall give to each juvenile granted parole a written statement of the conditions of the juvenile's parole, shall explain such conditions fully, and shall aid the juvenile to observe them. The juvenile parole officer shall have
periodic conferences with and reports from the juvenile. The juvenile parole officer may conduct such investigations or other activities as necessary to determine whether the conditions of parole are being met and to accomplish
the juvenile's rehabilitation.

All juvenile parole officers have the powers of peace officers, as described in sections 16-2.5-101 and 16-2.5-138, in performing the duties of their position.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 671, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-1003 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-1205. Administrative law judges.

An administrative law judge shall assist any hearing panel of the juvenile parole board that is considering the suspension, modification, or revocation of a juvenile's parole.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 671, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-208 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-1206. Parole violation and revocation.

The director of the division of youth services or any juvenile parole officer may arrest any parolee when:

The director or officer has a warrant commanding that the parolee be arrested; or

The director or officer has probable cause to believe that a warrant for the parolee's arrest has been issued in this state or another state for any criminal offense or for violation of a condition of parole; or

Any offense under the laws of this state has been or is being committed by the parolee in the director's or officer's presence; or

The director or officer has probable cause to believe that a violation of law has been committed by the parolee; or

The director or officer has probable cause to believe that the parolee has violated a condition of the juvenile's parole and probable cause to believe that the parolee is leaving or about to leave the state, or that the parolee will fail or refuse to
appear before the hearing panel to answer charges of violations of one or more conditions of parole, or that the parolee's arrest is necessary to prevent physical harm to the parolee or another person or to prevent the
violation of a law.

When an alleged parole violator is taken into custody, the director of the division of youth services or the juvenile parole officer shall notify the juvenile's parents, guardian, or legal custodian without unnecessary delay.

When a juvenile parole officer has reasonable grounds to believe that a parolee has violated a condition of parole, the juvenile parole officer may issue a summons requiring the parolee to appear before the hearing panel at a specified time and place
to answer charges of violation of one or more conditions of parole. The summons, unless accompanied by a copy of a complaint filed before the hearing panel seeking revocation or suspension of parole or modification of parole conditions,
must contain a brief statement of the alleged parole violation and the date and place of the alleged parole violation. Failure of the parolee to appear before the hearing panel as required by the summons is a violation of a condition
of parole.

If, rather than issuing a summons, a parole officer arrests a parolee with or without a warrant or takes custody of a parolee who has been arrested by another, the parole officer shall place the parolee in the nearest local juvenile detention facility
or shelter care facility approved by the department of human services, if under eighteen years of age, or in the nearest county jail, if eighteen years of age or older. Within forty-eight hours, not including Saturdays, Sundays,
and legal holidays, the parole officer shall take one of the following actions:

Notify the juvenile parole board that the parolee has been arrested or taken into custody and request that a juvenile parole preliminary hearing be conducted by an administrative law judge; or

Obtain from the parolee a written agreement that the parolee waives the right to a juvenile parole preliminary hearing. The parolee's parent or guardian shall also sign the waiver of the parolee if the parolee is a juvenile; or

Release the parolee if the parolee is not subject to other actions that require further detention.

An administrative law judge shall, upon the request of the juvenile parole board, conduct a preliminary hearing in a case in which a parole violation has been alleged to determine whether there is probable cause to believe that the parolee has violated
a condition of parole, pursuant to subsection (4) of this section.

Whenever an administrative law judge schedules a preliminary hearing pursuant to subsection (5) of this section, the juvenile parole officer shall notify the parolee and the parolee's parent, guardian, or legal custodian of the following information:

The date, the time, and the place of the preliminary hearing and the name of the administrative law judge;

That the purpose of the hearing is to determine whether there is probable cause to believe that the parolee has violated parole;

That at the preliminary hearing the parolee will be permitted to present evidence, either oral or documentary, in person or by other witnesses, in defense of any alleged parole violation;

A statement of any alleged parole violation;

A brief summary of the evidence tending to establish any alleged parole violation; and

That the parolee has the right to counsel at the preliminary hearing.

At any preliminary hearing held pursuant to subsection (5) of this section, the administrative law judge shall hear any offered testimony and determine whether there is probable cause to believe that the parolee has violated parole. If probable cause
has not been shown, the administrative law judge shall order the parolee's release and make a written report of the judge's findings to the juvenile parole board within fourteen days of the hearing.

If the administrative law judge finds that probable cause exists to believe that the parolee has violated parole, the administrative law judge shall order that the parolee be held to answer the charge before a hearing panel and shall order that the juvenile
parole officer return the parolee without unnecessary delay to any of the juvenile corrections facilities of the department of human services pending a hearing before a hearing panel on the complaint for revocation, suspension,
or modification of the juvenile's parole.

Within fourteen working days after the finding of probable cause by the preliminary administrative law judge, the juvenile parole officer shall complete the officer's investigation and either:

File a complaint before the hearing panel in which the facts are alleged upon which a revocation of parole is sought; or

Recommend to the director of the division of youth services, or the director's designee, that the parolee, if detained, be released and the violation proceedings be dismissed. The director, or the director's designee, shall determine whether to cause
the violation proceedings to be dismissed, and, if he or she elects to cause dismissal, the parolee must be released or notified that the parolee is relieved of obligation to appear before the hearing panel. In such event,
the director, or the director's designee, shall give written notification to the board of such action.

A complaint filed by a juvenile parole officer in which revocation of parole is sought must contain the name of the parolee, identify the violation charged and the condition or conditions of parole alleged to have been violated, including the date and
approximate location of the violation, and be signed by the juvenile parole officer. A copy must be given to the parolee and the parolee's parents, guardian, or legal custodian at least seven days before a hearing on the complaint
is held before the hearing panel.

The board may order the detention of any parolee for failure to appear as required by the summons issued pursuant to subsection (3) of this section.

At least seven days before the appearance of a parolee before the hearing panel, the juvenile parole officer shall provide, in writing, to the parolee and the parolee's parents, guardian, or legal custodian the following:

A statement of the nature of the charges that are alleged to justify revocation or suspension of parole and the substance of the evidence sustaining the charges;

A copy of the complaint unless he or she has already received one;

A listing of the consequences that may follow in the event parole is revoked; and

An advisement that, if the parolee denies the charges, a hearing will be held before the hearing panel, that, at the hearing, the parolee may testify and present witnesses and documentary evidence in defense of the charges or in mitigation or explanation,
and that the parolee has the right to counsel at the hearing.

At the hearing before the hearing panel, if the parolee denies the violation, the division of youth services has the burden of establishing by a preponderance of the evidence the violation of a condition or conditions of parole. The hearing panel shall,
when it appears that the alleged violation of conditions of parole consists of an offense with which the parolee is charged in a criminal case then pending, continue the parole violation hearing until the termination of the criminal
proceeding. Any evidence having probative value is admissible regardless of its admissibility under exclusionary rules of evidence if the parolee is accorded a fair opportunity to rebut hearsay evidence. The parolee has the right
to confront and to cross-examine adverse witnesses unless the administrative law judge specifically finds good cause for not allowing confrontation.

If the hearing panel determines that a violation of a condition or conditions of parole has been committed, it shall hear further evidence related to the parolee's disposition. At the conclusion of the hearing, the hearing panel shall advise the parties
of its findings and recommendations and of their right to request a review before the board. Such review may be held if a written request is filed within fourteen days after the conclusion of the hearing before the hearing panel.
If a review before the board is not requested or the right to review is waived, the findings and recommendations of the hearing panel, if unanimous, become the decision of the juvenile parole board unless the board on its own motion
orders a review.

The case of a juvenile alleged or found to have violated the conditions of parole outside the state of Colorado must be handled according to the interstate compact on juveniles, part 7 of article 60 of title 24.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 671, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-1004 as it existed prior to 2021.